Louisiana, session 2026, HB1042.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The commissioner of administration and the secretary of the Department
of Culture, Recreation and Tourism, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, are hereby authorized and empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease, or deliver
any interest, excluding mineral rights, the state may have in and to all or any portion of the
following described property in Jefferson Parish to Marengo Property II, LLC in exchange
for the property described in Section 2 of this Act:
Tract G-3-F-3, Segnette Park Subdivision, Jefferson Parish, Louisiana
Section 2. In exchange for the property described in Section 1 of this Act, the
commissioner of administration and the secretary of the Department of Culture, Recreation
and Tourism are hereby authorized and empowered to accept from Marengo Property II,
LLC title to all or any portion of the following described property:
Lots 441-A1 and 442-A2, Segnette Park Subdivision, Jefferson Parish,
Louisiana.
Section 3. The commissioner of administration and the secretary of the Department
of Culture, Recreation and Tourism are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements,
covenants, conditions, and stipulations and to execute such documents as may be necessary
to properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease, or delivery of title,
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-1467 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1042
excluding mineral rights, of the property described in Section 1 of this Act, and as more
specifically described in any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and
between the parties, provided that the state receives consideration proportionate to the
appraised value of any state property exchanged.
Section 4. The commissioner of administration and the secretary of the Department
of Culture, Recreation and Tourism, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, are hereby authorized and empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease, or deliver
any interest, excluding mineral rights, the state may have in and to all or any portion of the
following described property in Jefferson Parish to Marengo Property II, LLC:
Tract G-3-F-3, Segnette Park Subdivision, Jefferson Parish, Louisiana
Section 5. The commissioner of administration and the secretary of the Department
of Culture, Recreation and Tourism are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements,
covenants, conditions, and stipulations and to execute such documents as may be necessary
to properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease, or delivery of title,
excluding mineral rights, of the property described in Section 4 of this Act, and as more
specifically described in any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and
between the parties, in exchange for consideration proportionate to the appraised value of
the property.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.